en: Tomatoes
bg: Домати
da: Tomater
de: Tomaten, Tomate
es: Tomates
fi: tomaatit
fr: Tomates
he: עגבניות
hr: rajčice, rajčica
it: Pomodori
ja: トマト
nl: Tomaten
pl: Pomidory
pt: Tomates
ru: Помидоры
sv: Tomater
tr: Domates

en: Fresh tomatoes
de: Frische Tomaten
es: Tomates frescos
fi: Tuoreet tomaatit
fr: Tomates fraîches
hr: Svježe rajčice
it: Pomodori freschi
nl: Verse tomaten, Verse tomaat
pl: Pomidory świeże, Świeże pomidory

en: Cherry tomatoes
bg: Чери домати
da: Cherrytomater
de: Kirschtomaten, Kirschtomate
es: Tomates cherry
fi: kirsikkatomaatit
fr: Tomates cerise, Tomates cerises
hr: Cherry rajčice
it: Pomodori ciliegini
ja: ミニトマト
la: Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme, Lycopersicon lycopersicum var. cerasiforme, Lycopersicon esculentum var. cerasiforme
nl: Kerstomaten
sv: Körsbärstomater

en: Plum tomatoes, Processing tomatoes, Paste tomatoes
de: Eiertomaten
sv: Plommontomater

en: Cherry plum tomatoes, Baby plum tomatoes
sv: Babyplommontomater, Baby plommontomater

en: Fresh cherry plum tomatoes
sv: Ferska babyplommontomater

en: Datterini tomatoes
da: Datterini-tomater
it: Pomodoro datterini
sv: Datterini-tomater

en: Canned datterini tomatoes
da: Datterini-tomater på dåse
sv: Datterini-tomater på dås

en: Whole peeled datterini tomatoes in tomato juice
da: Flåede hele datterini-tomater i tomatsaft
sv: Hela skalade datterini-tomater i tomatjuice

xx: Pomodoro San Marzano dell'Agro Sarnese-Nocerino
en: San Marzano tomatoes
da: San Marzano-tomater
it: Pomodoro San Marzano
sv: San Marzano-tomater

en: Canned San Marzano tomatoes
da: San Marzano-tomater på dåse
sv: San Marzano-tomater på dås

en: Whole peeled San Marzano tomatoes in tomato juice
da: Flåede hele San Marzano-tomater i tomatsaft
sv: Hela skalade San Marzano-tomater i tomatjuice

en: Provencal-style tomatoes, Breaded tomatoes stuffed with garlic and parsley
fr: Tomates à la provençale

en: Pumpkin tomatoes
la: Solanum lycopersicum var. Cucurbita, Lycopersicon lycopersicum var. Cucurbita, Lycopersicon esculentum var. Cucurbita

en: Peeled tomatoes, Canned peeled tomatoes
bg: Белени домати, Белени домати в консерва
da: Flåede tomater
de: Geschälte Tomaten
es: Tomates pelados
fi: kuoritut tomaatit
fr: Tomates pelées, Tomates pelées en conserve, Tomates pelées appertisées
hr: Pelata
it: Pelati, Pomodori pelati
nb: Flådde tomater
nl: Geschilde tomaten
pt: Tomates pelados
sv: Skalade tomater

en: Whole peeled tomatoes in tomato juice
da: Flåede hele tomater i tomatsaft
fr: Tomates entières pelées au jus
sv: Hela skalade tomater i tomatjuice

en: Canned cherry tomatoes
da: Cherrytomater på dåse
sv: Körsbärstomater på dås

en: Canned tomato pulp
da: Hakkede tomater på dåse
fr: Pulpe de tomate appertisée
hr: Konzervirana pulpa rajčice
lt: Konservuotas pomidorų minkštimas
sv: Krossade tomater på dås

en: Canned fine tomato pulps
da: Finthakkede tomater på dåse
sv: Finkrossade tomater på dås

en: Frozen tomatoes
da: Frosne tomater
fr: Tomates surgelées